src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_NUAVNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** нуавны:нуа
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^LVBound Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS ; ! овны
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Dial/-v:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS ; ! олны
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-VOW ; ! л
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KUTNY ; !л
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Dial/-l:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^LVBound Verb-nyDer-ONSET-VOW ; ! в
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Dial/-l:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^LVBound VerbDer_KUTNY ; ! в

@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^LVBound VerbDer-V ; ! в
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Dial/-v:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; ! л
: VerbConj_KUTNY ; !а колӧ
+Dial/-l:^LVBound VerbConj_KUTNY ; ! ковӧ
:^LVBound VerbConj-V ; !! Consonant-onset в
+Dial/-v: VerbConj-V ; !! Consonant-onset л

LEXICON V_NUALNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** нуавны:нуал
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^LVBound Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-VOW ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KUTNY ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^LVBound VerbDer-V ; !
!: VerbConj_KUTNY ; !а
!:^LVBound VerbConj-V ; !! Consonant-onset
+Err/Orth-l-retension: VerbConj-V ; !! Consonant-onset allows for l retension here

!LEXICON VR_ARTASJNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ь Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ь Verb-nyDer-ONSET-Y ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-JA ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_ARTASJNY ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ь VerbDer-V ; !
!+Refl: VerbConj ; !а
!+Refl: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON V_ARTASJNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** артасьны:артас -Cны.
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_ARTASJNY ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
: VerbConj ; !а
: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON VR_LYDDJYNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^VowRM Verb-ynyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^VowRM VerbDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ы VerbDer-V ; !
+Refl:^VowRM VerbConj ; ! check this!!!
+Refl: VerbConj-V ; ! check this!!!

LEXICON V_LYDDJYNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** лыддьыны:лыддьы ! ярмыны. Multiple-syllable verb ending in -ыны.
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^VowRM Verb-ynyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^VowRM VerbDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^VowRM VerbDer-ONSET_JI ; !2024-05-08
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
:^VowRM VerbConj ; ! check this!!!
: VerbConj-V ; ! check this!!!

!LEXICON VR_VOLYNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-ynyDer ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KUTNY ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ы VerbDer-V ; !
!+Refl: VerbConj_KUTNY ; ! check this!!!
!+Refl:ы VerbConj-V ; ! check this!!!

LEXICON V_VOLYNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** волыны:волы ! ярмыны. Multiple-syllable verb ending in -ыны.
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^VowRM Verb-ynyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^VowRM VerbDer_KUTNY ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
:^VowRM VerbConj_KUTNY ; ! check this!!!
: VerbConj-V ; ! check this!!!

! First model: ы added as part of the suffix in б
! суффикс а
! янӧд -----------\
!                   ышт, ан...
! ярм ------------/

! суффикс б
! янӧд -----------\
!                   ны, 
! ярм ----- ы ----/


! Second model: ы added earlier, and not as part of the suffix in б
! суффикс а
! янӧд -----------\
!                   ышт, ан...
! ярм ------------/

! суффикс б
! янӧд -----------\
!                   ыны, 
! ярм ------------/



! =================== !
!! ## Verb conjugation 
! =================== !

LEXICON VerbConj-V !!≈ * **@CODE@**  суф б -- ы 
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Inf:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>ны VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.1@+Inf+Px1:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.1@%>ным VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2@+Inf+Px2:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2@%>ныт VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3@+Inf+Px3:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3@%>ныс VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@+Inf+Px2+Acc:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@%>нытӧ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@+Inf+Px3+Acc:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@%>нысӧ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+ConNeg+Pl3:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ны VerbEnd ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+ConNeg:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ VerbEnd ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Imprt+Sg2:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@ VerbEnd ;

LEXICON VerbConj !!≈ * **@CODE@** суф а
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Finiteforms ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Non-finiteforms ;

LEXICON VerbConj_KYJNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** суф а
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Finiteforms_KYJNY ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KYJNY ;

LEXICON VerbConj_AMNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** суф а
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Finiteforms_AMNY ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Non-finiteforms ;

LEXICON VerbConj_KUTNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** суф а
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Finiteforms_KUTNY ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KUTNY ; !


LEXICON Finiteforms  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Gives linking vowels for 3 tenses
 present ;
 future ;
 preterite ;
 imperative ;

LEXICON Finiteforms_KYJNY  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Gives linking vowels for 3 tenses
 present_KYJNY ;
 future_KYJNY ;
: preterite_KYJNY ;
: imperative ;

LEXICON Finiteforms_AMNY  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Gives linking vowels for 3 tenses
 present_AMNY ;
 future_AMNY ;
 preterite_AMNY ;
 imperative ;

LEXICON Finiteforms_KUTNY  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Gives linking vowels for 3 tenses
 present_KUTNY ;
 future_KUTNY ;
 preterite_KUTNY ;
 imperative ;

LEXICON present
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>{ая} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Present
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>ӧ PresPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3

LEXICON present_KYJNY
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>{ая} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Present
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>ӧ PresPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3

LEXICON present_AMNY
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>{ая} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Present
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>ӧ PresPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3

LEXICON present_KUTNY
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>{ая} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Present
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>ӧ PresPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3

LEXICON future
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@%>{ая} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Future
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>{ая}с FutPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3 FutPret1-SgPl3   ХХХ check this

LEXICON future_KYJNY
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@%>{ая} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Future
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>{ая}с FutPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3 FutPret1-SgPl3   ХХХ check this

LEXICON future_AMNY
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@%>{ая} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Future
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>{ая}с FutPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3 FutPret1-SgPl3   ХХХ check this

LEXICON future_KUTNY
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@%>{ая} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Future
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>{ая}с FutPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3 FutPret1-SgPl3   ХХХ check this

LEXICON preterite
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>{иі} PresPret1 ; 
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>{иі}  P3 ; ! 3 
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@+Ind+Prt2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@%>ӧм Pret2a ;
