src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
вовлісьны+V:воввись V_ARTASJNY ;
вочлісьны+V:вочвись V_ARTASJNY ;
вӧтлыны+Hom1+V:вӧтлы V_VOLYNY ;
вӧтлыны+Hom2+V:вӧтлы V_VOLYNY ;
вӧтьны+V:вӧть V_ARTASJNY ;
гегдыны+V:гегды V_LYDDJYNY ;
гывъявны+V:гывьял V_NUAVNY ;
дзигавны+V:дзигал V_NUAVNY ;
дугдыны+V:дугды V_LYDDJYNY ;
зоравны+Hom1+V:зорал V_NUAVNY ;
зоравны+Hom2+V:зорал V_NUAVNY ;
зэлӧтчыны+V:зэӧччы V_LYDDJYNY ;
йывны+V:йыл V_NUAVNY ;
кабравны+V:кабрал V_NUAVNY ;
казявны+Hom1+V:казял V_NUAVNY ;
казявны+Hom2+V:казял V_NUAVNY ;
керыштлыны+Hom1+V:керыштлы V_VOLYNY ;
керыштлыны+Hom2+V:керыштлы V_VOLYNY ;
кесліcьны+V:кесвись V_ARTASJNY ;
китсавны+V:китсал V_NUAVNY ;
кодззӧтлыны+V:кодззӧтвы V_LYDDJYNY ;
кокавны+Hom1+V:кокал V_NUAVNY ;
кокавны+Hom2+V:кокал V_NUAVNY ;
кольласьны+V:кольвась V_ARTASJNY ;
кольттявлыны+V:колькьяллы V_VOLYNY ;
косясьны+Hom2+V:косясь V_ARTASJNY ;
коттьыны+Hom2+V:коттьы V_LYDDJYNY ;
кӧвьясьны+V:кӧлъясь V_ARTASJNY ;
кӧдзывсявны+Hom1+V:кӧдзывсял V_NUAVNY ;
кӧдзывсявны+Hom2+V:кӧдзывсял V_NUAVNY ;
кужлыны+V:кужвы V_LYDDJYNY ;
кусіньтлыны+V:кусіньтвы V_LYDDJYNY ;
куштіcьны+V:куштіcь V_ARTASJNY ;
кызӧтчыны+Hom1+V:кызӧтчы V_LYDDJYNY ;
кылзисьны+V:кылзись V_ARTASJNY ;
кырласьны+V:кырвась V_ARTASJNY ;
кышӧптыны+V:кышӧпты V_LYDDJYNY ;
лапьясьны+V:вапьясь V_ARTASJNY ;
лонтлывлыны+V:вонтвыввы V_LYDDJYNY ;
лӧгасьны+V:вӧгась V_ARTASJNY ;
лӧньны+V:лӧнь V_ARTASJNY ;
лыддисьны+V:лыддись V_ARTASJNY ;
лыйсьыны+V:выйсьы V_LYDDJYNY ;
лэдзавлыны+V:ведзаввы V_LYDDJYNY ;
лэдзчисьны+V:веччись V_ARTASJNY ;
масьтывлыны+V:масьтыввы V_LYDDJYNY ;
модьны+V:модь V_ARTASJNY ;
мӧдӧтлыны+Hom1+V:мӧдӧтлы V_VOLYNY ;
мӧдӧтлыны+Hom2+V:мӧдӧтлы V_VOLYNY ;
муркӧтлыны+V:муркӧтвы V_LYDDJYNY ;
мывкыдcявны+V:мывкыдcял V_NUAVNY ;
нетшкывлыны+V:нетшкыввы V_LYDDJYNY ;
нильны+Hom2+V:ниль V_ARTASJNY ;
нырлыны+V:нырвы V_LYDDJYNY ;
овсьыны+V:олсьы V_LYDDJYNY ;
окласьны+V:оквась V_ARTASJNY ;
орласьны+V:орвась V_ARTASJNY ;
отсавлыны+V:отсаввы V_LYDDJYNY ;
ӧмидзавны+V:ӧмидзал V_NUAVNY ;
ӧтлаасьны+V:ӧтваась V_ARTASJNY ;
ӧшлісьны+Hom1+V:ӧшлісь V_ARTASJNY ;
ӧшліcьны+Hom2+V:ӧшліcь V_ARTASJNY ;
паклясявны+Hom1+V:паклясял V_NUAVNY ;
паклясявны+Hom2+V:паклясял V_NUAVNY ;
панласьны+V:панвась V_ARTASJNY ;
панявсьыны+V:панялсьы V_LYDDJYNY ;
пешліcьны+V:пешвись V_ARTASJNY ;
пизьдыны+V:пизьды V_LYDDJYNY ;
пиньласьны+V:пиньвась V_ARTASJNY ;
пичкывлыштны+V:пичкыллы V_VOLYNY ;
повзьыны+V:ползьы V_LYDDJYNY ;
подавны+V:подал V_NUAVNY ;
поркьявны+V:поркьял V_NUAVNY ;
потласьны+V:потвась V_ARTASJNY ;
пӧвсасьны+V:пӧлсась V_ARTASJNY ;
пӧжлыны+V:пӧжвы V_LYDDJYNY ;
пӧрласьны+V:пӧрвась V_ARTASJNY ;
пуктыны+V:пукты V_LYDDJYNY ;
пырзьӧтлывлыны+V:пырзьӧтвыввы V_LYDDJYNY ;
риззьывлыны+V:риззьыввы V_LYDDJYNY ;
родегсявны+V:родегсял V_NUAVNY ;
садіcьны+V:садіcь V_ARTASJNY ;
свистайтлыны+V:свистайтвы V_LYDDJYNY ;
свӧнъясьны+V:свӧнъясь V_ARTASJNY ;
сёрнитлывлыны+V:сёрнитвывлы V_VOLYNY ;
сиптыны+V:сипты V_LYDDJYNY ;
скоклыны+V:скоклы V_VOLYNY ;
содтывны+V:содтыл V_NUAVNY ;
сӧдзлыны+V:сӧдзвы V_LYDDJYNY ;
сӧскывны+V:сӧскыл V_NUAVNY ;
судзласьны+V:судзвась V_ARTASJNY ;
суктыны+V:сукты V_LYDDJYNY ;
сывьявлыны+V:сывьявлы V_VOLYNY ;
сьӧвзисьны+V:сьӧвзись V_ARTASJNY ;
сьӧдӧтлывлыны+V:сьӧдӧтвыввы V_LYDDJYNY ;
тарласьны+V:тарвась V_ARTASJNY ;
торкнитлывлыны+V:торкнитвыввы V_LYDDJYNY ;
тӧдсӧтлыны+V:тӧдсӧтвы V_LYDDJYNY ;
тӧждіcьны+V:тӧждіcь V_ARTASJNY ;
тӧрӧтчывлыны+V:торӧччыллы V_VOLYNY ;
туктывлыны+V:туктыввы V_LYDDJYNY ;
тулупасьны+V:тувупась V_ARTASJNY ;
тыдӧвтчыны+V:тыдӧлччы V_LYDDJYNY ;
удлыны+V:удвы V_LYDDJYNY ;
чагдіcьны+V:чагдіcь V_ARTASJNY ;
чашыктыны+V:чашыкты V_LYDDJYNY ;
чинтіcьны+V:чинтіcь V_ARTASJNY ;
човны+V:чол V_NUAVNY ;
чӧвтсьыны+V:чӧлтсьы V_LYDDJYNY ;
чувйисьны+V:чувйись V_ARTASJNY ;
чужьявлыны+V:чужжаллы V_VOLYNY ;
чывны+V:чыл V_NUAVNY ;
шатӧвтчыны+V:шатӧлччы V_LYDDJYNY ;
шедтіcьлыны+V:шедтіcьлы V_VOLYNY ;
шедтіcьны+V:шедтіcь V_ARTASJNY ;
шойччисьны+V:шойччись V_ARTASJNY ;
шӧмӧтлыны+V:шӧмӧтвы V_LYDDJYNY ;
шырлыны+V:шырвы V_LYDDJYNY ;
ыждавны+V:ыждал V_NUAVNY ;
ышловзисьны+V:ышловзись V_ARTASJNY ;
юктасьлыны+V:юктасьвы V_LYDDJYNY ;
янӧтлыны+V:янӧтлы V_VOLYNY ;
